Tennessee statutes. Title 13 Public Planning And Housing
Part 4

Historic Zoning

13-7-401. Purposes.

The purpose of this part is to promote the educational, cultural, and economic welfare of the people of the state by enabling municipalities and counties to preserve and protect historic structures, areas and districts which serve as visible reminders of the history and cultural heritage of the state and the United States. Furthermore, it is the purpose of this part to strengthen the economy of the state and of the adopting governmental entities by stabilizing and improving the property values in historic areas, by encouraging rehabilitation and new construction and development that will be harmonious with the historic structures, areas and districts, and by preserving and rehabilitating buildings which are of significance to historic districts.

Acts 1965, ch. 222, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-416; T.C.A., § 13-716; modified; Acts 1982, ch. 814, § 1.

Cross-References. Local regulation of junkyards, § 54-20-122.

Zoning regulations in metropolitan governments, § 7-3-304.

13-7-402. Historic zones established.

In order to accomplish the purpose of this part, the legislative body of any county or municipality is empowered to establish special historic districts or zones, and to regulate the construction, repair, alteration, rehabilitation, relocation and demolition of any building or other structure which is located or is proposed to be located within the boundaries of any historic district or zone, in accordance with the conditions and procedures specified in this part.

A historic district or zone may be superimposed on other districts or zones, including the zoning maps, established by any other zoning ordinance or regulation, whether established before or after the establishment of a historic district or zone.

The permitted or prohibited property uses, the zoning procedures and other regulations otherwise applicable within a historic district or zone under any other zoning ordinance or regulation shall apply to a historic district or zone, except when in conflict with this part or any ordinance or regulation adopted pursuant to this part, but in the event of such conflict, this part and any ordinance or regulation adopted pursuant to this part shall control.

Acts 1982, ch. 814, § 1; 1987, ch. 361, §§ 3, 4; 2004, ch. 632, § 1.

13-7-403. Historic zoning commission — Regional historic zoning commissions.

The local legislative body shall create a historic zoning commission of no less than five (5) and no more than nine (9) members which shall consist of a representative of a local patriotic or historical organization; an architect, if available; a person who is a member of the local planning commission at the time of such person's appointment; and the remainder shall be from the community in general. The historic zoning commission shall be appointed by the chief executive of the county or municipality, subject to confirmation by the local legislative body. The terms of members of the historic zoning commission shall be five (5) years, except that the members appointed initially shall be appointed for staggered terms so that the terms of at least one (1) member but not more than two (2) members shall expire each year. All members shall serve without compensation. The commission may adopt rules and regulations consistent with this part.

In any area of the state served by a regional planning commission created pursuant to chapter 3 of this title, the local legislative bodies of the region served by such commission may create a regional historic zoning commission. The regional historic zoning commission shall have no less than five (5) and no more than nine (9) members which shall consist of a representative of a local patriotic or historical organization; an architect, if available; a person who is a member of the regional planning commission, at the time of such person's appointment; one (1) member from each legislative body in the area served by the regional planning commission; and the remainder shall be from the community in general. An equal number of representatives shall be appointed by the chief executive of each county and/or municipality served by the regional planning commission, subject to the confirmation by the legislative body, except that the regional planning commission shall nominate the member of that commission who shall serve on the regional historic zoning commission and that member shall be confirmed by the legislative bodies of all the counties and/or municipalities within the area served by the regional planning commission. The terms of members of the regional historic zoning commission shall be five (5) years, except that members appointed initially shall be appointed for staggered terms so that the terms of at least one (1) member, but no more than two (2) members, shall expire each year. The term of the member nominated from the regional planning commission shall be concurrent with the term on the regional planning commission, and the term of members from the local legislative body shall be concurrent with the terms on the local legislative body. All members shall serve without compensation. The commission may adopt rules and regulations consistent with this part.

This subsection (b) shall not apply in any county having a metropolitan form of government and having a population of not less than four hundred thousand (400,000) nor more than five hundred thousand (500,000), according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

Acts 1982, ch. 814, § 1; 1987, ch. 40, §§ 1, 7.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

13-7-404. “Historic district or zone” defined.

Historic districts or zones may be established by a county or municipal legislative body, either as a part of a new zoning ordinance or as an amendment to existing ordinances. For the purpose of this part, “historic district or zone” is defined as a geographically definable area which possesses a significant individual structure or a concentration, linkage or continuity of sites, buildings, structures or objects which are united by past events or aesthetically by plan or physical development, and which meets one (1) or more of the following criteria:

It is associated with an event which has made a significant contribution to local, state, or national history;

It includes structures associated with the lives of persons significant in local, state, or national history;

It contains structures or groups of structures which embody the distinctive characteristics of a type, period, or method of construction, or that represent the work of a master, or that possess high artistic values, or that represent a significant and distinguishable entity whose components may lack individual distinction;

It has yielded or may be likely to yield archaeological information important in history or prehistory; or

It is listed in the National Register of Historic Places.

Acts 1982, ch. 814, § 1; 1989, ch. 422, § 1.

13-7-405. Recommendations concerning creation of historic districts or zones.

The historic zoning commission has the authority to submit recommendations to the county or municipal legislative body regarding the creation of historic districts and zones in accordance with the definition set forth in this part. Prior to establishing a historic district or zone, the county or municipal legislative body shall refer any historic district or zone proposal to the historic zoning commission for its recommendations, and the historic zoning commission shall furnish the legislative body its recommendations on such proposal in writing.

The regional historic zoning commission has the authority to submit recommendations to any county or municipal legislative body within the area served by the regional historic zoning commission regarding the creation of historic districts and zones in accordance with the definition set forth in this part. Prior to establishing a historic district or zone, the county or municipal legislative body of the area in which the establishment of the zone or district is being considered shall refer any historic district or zone proposal to the regional historic zoning commission for its recommendations, and the regional historic zoning commission shall furnish the legislative body its recommendations on such proposal in writing. In addition, the recommendation of the regional historic zoning commission shall be referred to the regional planning commission which shall consider the district or zone and refer its recommendation regarding the proposed district or zone to the legislative body in writing.

This subsection (b) shall not apply in any county having a metropolitan form of government and having a population of not less than four hundred thousand (400,000) nor more than five hundred thousand (500,000), according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

Acts 1982, ch. 814, § 1; 1987, ch. 40, §§ 2, 7.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Cross-References. Historic district or zone defined, § 13-7-404.

13-7-406. Review guidelines — Public hearing — Notice.

Prior to the establishment of any historic district or zone, the historic zoning commission or the regional historic zoning commission also shall adopt for each such proposed district or zone a set of review guidelines, which it will apply in ruling upon the granting or denial of a certificate of appropriateness as provided for in this part. Such review guidelines shall be consistent with the purposes of this part and with regulations and standards adopted by the secretary of the interior pursuant to the National Historic Preservation Act of 1966 (16 U.S.C. § 470 et seq.), applicable to the construction, alteration, rehabilitation, relocation or demolition of any building, structure or other improvement situated within a historic district which has been certified by the secretary of the interior as a registered historic district. Reasonable public notice and opportunity for public comment, by public hearing or otherwise, shall be required before the historic zoning commission or the regional historic zoning commission adopts any such review guidelines.

Acts 1982, ch. 814, § 1; 1987, ch. 40, § 3; 1989, ch. 422, § 2.

13-7-407. Applications for permits for construction in historic zones — Certificates of appropriateness.

All applications for permits for construction, alteration, repair, rehabilitation, relocation or demolition of any building, structure or other improvement to real estate situated within a historic zone or district shall be referred to the historic zoning commission or the regional historic zoning commission, which shall have broad powers to request detailed construction plans and related data pertinent to thorough review of the proposal. The historic zoning commission or the regional historic zoning commission may also be authorized to review the construction, alteration, rehabilitation, relocation or demolition of any building, structure or other improvement on real property, whether privately or publicly owned, which is situated in a historic district or zone, and for which a permit is not required. No construction, alteration, repair, rehabilitation, relocation or demolition of any building, structure or other improvement to real property situated within a historic district or zone, for which the historic zoning commission or the regional historic zoning commission has been granted the authority to review and to grant or deny a certificate of appropriateness, shall be performed without the issuance of a certificate of appropriateness.

The governing board of any municipality may enact an ordinance to prevent the demolition by neglect of any designated landmark or any building or structure within an established historic zone or district. Such ordinance shall provide appropriate safeguards to protect property owners from undue economic hardship.

Acts 1982, ch. 814, § 1; 1987, ch. 40, § 4; 1991, ch. 309, § 1.

13-7-408. Issuance or denial of certificate of appropriateness — Guidelines.

The historic zoning commission or the regional historic zoning commission shall, within thirty (30) days following the availability of sufficient data, grant a certificate of appropriateness with or without attached conditions or deny the certificate, and shall state the grounds for denial in writing. In its review of any such work to be undertaken in a historic district or zone, the historic zoning commission or the regional historic zoning commission shall apply the applicable review guidelines and give prime consideration to:

Historic or architectural value of the present structure;

The relationship of the exterior architectural features of such structure to the rest of the structures, to the surrounding area, and to the character of the district;

The general compatibility of exterior design, arrangement, texture, and materials proposed to be used; and

Any other factor, including aesthetic, which is reasonably related to the purposes of this part.

Acts 1982, ch. 814, § 1; 1987, ch. 40, § 5.

13-7-409. Appeals.

Anyone who may be aggrieved by any final order or judgment of the historic zoning commission or regional historic zoning commission may have such order or judgment reviewed by the courts by the procedure of statutory certiorari, as provided in title 27, chapter 8.

Acts 1982, ch. 814, § 1; 1987, ch. 40, § 6.

13-7-410. Applicability of part relative to regional historic zoning commissioners.

The provisions of this part relative to “regional historic zoning commissioners” shall not apply in any county having a metropolitan form of government and having a population of not less than four hundred thousand (400,000) nor more than five hundred thousand (500,000), according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

Acts 1987, ch. 40, § 7.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.